Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 11 Local Police And Fire Pension And Relief Funds
24-11-213. Allocation of insurance premium tax — Apportionments.

The premium taxes collected under § 24-11-301 shall be placed in a fund combined with the premium taxes collected pursuant to § 24-11-809.

The combined fund shall be entitled the “Firemen's and Police Officers' Pension and Relief Fund”.

The Firemen's and Police Officers' Pension and Relief Fund shall consist of a “fire portion” and a “police portion”.

The remaining revenues collected under §§ 23-60-102, 24-11-301, 24-11-809, 26-57-601 — 26-57-605, and 26-57-607 shall be distributed to the Firemen's and Police Officers' Pension and Relief Fund and to the State of Arkansas as general revenues.

Revenues distributed to the State of Arkansas as general revenues are subject to the allocations under § 24-11-215.

The allocation of funds between the Firemen's and Police Officers' Pension and Relief Fund and the General Revenue Fund Account under this section is subject to the following conditions:

The Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board shall review annually the distribution of funds to each qualified city, town, or fire protection district made in the previous calendar year before disbursing funds to an area qualified under § 24-11-214;

The board shall consider as part of the annual assessment of the allocation of the disbursement of funds under § 24-11-214:

The certification of a new city, town, or fire protection district for participation in the Firemen's and Police Officers' Pension and Relief Fund;

A change in the legal description of a city, town, or fire protection district.

A change in the legal description of a city, town, or fire protection district shall be reported to the board annually by December 15; and

A population change that is caused by a change in the legal description of a city, town, or fire protection district;

The total population of a city, town, or fire protection district that is qualified to participate in the Firemen's and Police Officers' Pension and Relief Fund shall be determined by a census population assessment in the city, town, or fire protection district.

The population of a city, town, or fire protection district shall be determined by the Census State Data Center at the Arkansas Economic Development Institute at the University of Arkansas at Little Rock;

The legal description of the metes and bounds of a city, town, or fire protection district shall be:

Based on:

The standard physical features of the area; or

Boundaries that are determined by a Global Positioning System survey if the legal description of the metes and bounds of a city, town, or fire protection district cannot be based on the standard physical features of the area; and

Determined by:

A surveyor licensed in Arkansas;

A preexisting map maintained by the city, town, or fire protection district; or

The Geographic Information Systems Applications Laboratory located in the Donald W. Reynolds Center for Business and Economic Development at the University of Arkansas at Little Rock;

The preferred legal description of the metes and bounds of a city, town, or fire protection district shall be based on the standard physical features of the area.

A local department shall change the description of the metes and bounds of the department to the standard physical features of the area.

In the case of a fire department, the county quorum court shall determine the description of the standard physical features of the area if the local chief cannot make the determination; and

The accuracy of the metes and bounds legal description of a city, town, or fire protection district shall be certified to the board by the:

Mayor or other qualified representative of a city or town; or

County fire coordinator of a rural fire protection district.

The portion of revenues that may be distributed to the Firemen's and Police Officers' Pension and Relief Fund under this section shall be:

Forty percent (40%) of the total actuarial cost for a paid group covered by the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System;

One hundred percent (100%) of the actuarial cost for a volunteer group covered by the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System minus required employer contributions; and

Thirty percent (30%) of the consolidation and local pension and relief fund actuarial costs as provided under § 24-11-214.

The remaining portion of revenues shall be distributed to the General Revenue Fund Account of the State Apportionment Fund.

The portion of revenues distributed in accordance with subdivision (c)(1) of this section is subject to the requirements of § 24-11-215.

The amount of revenues allocated to the Firemen's and Police Officers' Pension and Relief Fund for the fire portion and the amount of revenues allocated to the Firemen's and Police Officers' Pension and Relief Fund for the police portion shall be kept separate.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1797, § 1; 2011, No. 979, § 4; 2013, No. 1134, § 3; 2019, No. 465, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The Geographic Information Systems Lab is an activity of the Arkansas Geographic Information Systems Board. For creation and structure see
§ 15-21-501 et seq.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment added (c)(3).

The 2013 amendment inserted “Account of the State Apportionment Fund” at the end of (c)(2).

The 2019 amendment rewrote (b) through (d).

24-11-214. Allocation of insurance premium tax — Division among localities.

An actuary certified by the Society of Actuaries shall evaluate the information submitted under this section and §§ 24-11-213 and 24-11-215 to determine the amount of the premium tax revenues to be directed to each city, town, or fire protection district.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that the allocation of revenues to the Firemen's and Police Officers' Pension and Relief Fund be directed to a city, town, or fire protection district based on the actuarial cost of their retirement programs.

The actuarial cost for a calendar year:

For a group that is a member of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System, shall equal that group's calculated contribution rate, as defined in § 24-10-405, as of the beginning of that calendar year multiplied by that group's estimated annual payroll as of the beginning of that calendar year.

However, for volunteer members the actuarial cost shall equal the group's per-person cost, less the mandatory employer per-person cost, as of the beginning of that calendar year multiplied by the number of volunteer members in that group as of the beginning of that calendar year.

The additional cost for a group that is a member of the system that results from a consolidation of a local policemen's pension and relief fund or a local firemen's relief and pension fund shall be calculated separately for this allocation purpose;

For a group that is covered by a local policemen's pension and relief fund or a local firemen's relief and pension fund, shall be the cost calculated by the actuary for the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board for the preceding calendar year; and

An actuarial cost in this subsection shall be calculated on the base benefit.

The base benefit is the minimum amount prescribed under § 24-10-101 et seq. and § 24-11-101 et seq., excluding all elective benefit increases.

The amount of revenues to be directed to cities, towns, and fire protection districts shall equal the amount in the Firemen's and Police Officers' Pension and Relief Fund less the payment for the administrative and actuarial expenses of the board under subsection (i) of this section and under § 24-11-203.

The amount of revenue directed to a city, town, or fire protection district shall equal the amount described in subsection (c) of this section less the amount described in subsection (e) of this section.

The Future Supplement Fund shall be allocated the amount determined as the total amount under § 24-11-212.

All cities, towns, and fire protection districts having fire departments organized under §§ 24-11-801 — 24-11-807, 24-11-809, 24-11-813 — 24-11-815, and 24-11-818 — 24-11-820, and all cities and towns having police departments organized under § 24-11-101 et seq., § 24-11-201 et seq., § 24-11-301 et seq., § 24-11-401 et seq., and §§ 24-11-801 — 24-11-807, 24-11-809, 24-11-811 — 24-11-820, 24-11-822 — 24-11-827, 24-11-829, and 24-11-830 that have provided the information required under §§ 24-11-206 and 24-11-213 to the board and to the system shall qualify for participation in the revenues distributed.

Those cities, towns, and fire protection districts that make an irrevocable decision to elect coverage in the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System by December 14 shall qualify for participation in the revenues distributed in the following calendar year.

Those cities, towns, and fire protection districts that have not provided the required information shall not qualify for participation in the revenues distributed.

On or before June 15 of each calendar year after 2002, the board shall certify to the Department of Finance and Administration the exact amount of tax revenues each city, town, or fire protection district is entitled to receive for the calendar year under this section.

The Arkansas Fire Training Academy and the Arkansas Law Enforcement Training Academy are not eligible for participation in the receipt of or funding with premium tax revenues.

All nonprofit corporations formed for fire protection purposes and that participate in the system shall participate in the distribution of insurance premium tax revenues to the same extent as other fire protection organizations under this section, §§ 24-10-401 — 24-10-409, 24-11-809, and 26-57-610, and any other laws providing for the distribution of insurance premium tax moneys to fire protection organizations.

There shall be no administrative fees charged to these entities by the board upon qualification.

The board shall incur all administrative and actuarial costs associated with obtaining the information required under this section.

The board shall establish a certain percentage of the insurance tax revenues to use to meet its proper actuarial expenses and administrative costs incurred in obtaining and evaluating the population information required under § 24-11-213, but in no event shall the board be entitled to more than one percent (1%) of the Firemen's and Police Officers' Pension and Relief Fund as defined in § 24-11-809(a)(2).

This assessment shall be collected in addition to the assessment provided in § 24-11-203.

This revenue shall also be used to provide the administrative costs incurred in obtaining and evaluating the population information for unqualified cities, towns, and fire protection districts.

The amount allocated to groups that are members of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System excluding consolidation costs under subdivision (b)(2)(A)(iii) of this section is the actuarial cost under subdivision (b)(2) of this section multiplied by the factor in § 24-11-215.

The amount allocated to groups that are covered by a local firemen's relief and pension fund or a local policemen's pension and relief fund including consolidation costs under subdivision (b)(2)(A)(iii) of this section is the actuarial cost under subdivision (b)(2) of this section multiplied by the factor in § 24-11-215.

The Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board shall promulgate rules that are necessary to implement this section.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1797, § 1; 2007, No. 73, § 4; 2007, No. 609, §§ 1, 2; 2009, No. 259, § 1; 2009, No. 654, § 4; 2011, No. 979, § 5; 2013, No. 41, § 8; 2013, No. 522, § 4; 2019, No. 465, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment by No. 259 inserted “except as provided in subdivision (e)(6)(E) of this section” in (e)(6)(C); added (e)(6)(E); and made related changes.

The 2009 amendment by No. 654 substituted “§ 24-11-213(d)(2) and (3)” for “subdivisions (a)(2) and (3) of this section” in (h)(3)(C).

The 2011 amendment inserted (b)(2)(iv); deleted “dollar” preceding “cost” in (b)(2)(B); inserted (b)(2)(E); and added (l) through (n).

The 2013 amendment by No. 41 deleted (e)(13)(B) and redesignated (e)(13)(A) as (e)(13).

The 2013 amendment by No. 522 added (h)(4).

The 2019 amendment rewrote the section.

24-11-215. Allocation of insurance premium tax — Special provisions.

Revenues distributed to the State of Arkansas as general revenue are subject to the allocations in this section.

All taxes that are levied on insurers that are allocated to general revenues under § 24-11-213 may be allocated to the Fire Protection Premium Tax Fund, underfunded plans under § 24-11-217, and then to general revenues.

For the 1999-2000 state fiscal year, six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000) of the fire portion of funds transferred to general revenues under this section and § 24-11-213 shall be transferred to the Fire Protection Premium Tax Fund.

In all subsequent years fifty percent (50%) of the percentage increase in the amount allocated to general revenues under this section and § 24-11-213, using the dollar amount allocated in fiscal year 1999-2000 as the baseline, shall be transferred to the Fire Protection Premium Tax Fund in addition to the six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000) per year until the time that a cap of two million dollars ($2,000,000) annually is transferred to the Fire Protection Premium Tax Fund.

Thereafter, the annual transfer shall be set at two million dollars ($2,000,000).

After transfers are made to cover funds distributed under subsection (b) of this section and the portion of those premium taxes set aside for transfer to the State Police Retirement Fund under § 24-6-209(b), the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration is directed to make annual transfers from the police portion of the revenues to the Policemen's Pension Supplement Program Fund on or before July 25, 1999, and each year thereafter as certified by the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board on July 1 each year as the amount needed to pay the expenses of and to make payments to the eligible retired police officers and survivors under the Arkansas Policemen's Pension Supplement Program for the coming year of the program.

The amounts under § 24-11-217 shall be reduced proportionately so that the remainder portion for general revenue does not fall below four million dollars ($4,000,000).

The factor applied to groups allocated under § 24-11-214(j) is forty percent (40%).

The factor applied to groups allocated under § 24-11-214(k) is thirty percent (30%).

The factors under subdivision (e)(1) of this section may be reduced proportionately to meet the following criteria:

The general revenue portion resulting from this subsection does not fall below four million dollars ($4,000,000); and

If the amount resulting from the application of the percentages under subdivision (e)(1) of this section, the amounts in subsections (b) and (c) of this section, and the amounts described in § 24-11-217 in total reduce the general revenue portion of the allocation below four million dollars ($4,000,000), the amounts resulting from the percentages in this subsection take precedence.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1797, § 1; 2011, No. 979, § 6; 2013, No. 41, § 9; 2019, No. 465, § 4; 2019, No. 910, § 3562.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment inserted “underfunded plans under § 24-11-217” in (b)(1); and added (e) and (f).

The 2013 amendment deleted “the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Guarantee Fund” in (b)(1); deleted (b)(3) and (b)(4); and substituted “Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board” for “board” in (c).

The 2019 amendment by No. 465 deleted former (d) and redesignated former (e) and (f) as (d) and (e); updated references throughout (e); and, in (e)(2)(B), inserted “application of the”, “and the amounts described in § 24-11-217”, and “in this subsection”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (c).

24-11-216. Minimum asset management standards.

A local firemen's relief and pension fund or a local policemen's pension and relief fund shall meet the minimum asset management standards established under this section.

A local firemen's relief and pension fund or a local policemen's pension and relief fund shall be deemed to have met the minimum asset management standards if:

The local firemen's relief and pension fund or the local policemen's pension and relief fund has a legally constituted board of trustees under §§ 24-11-405 and 24-11-801;

The board of trustees of the firemen's relief and pension fund or the board of trustees of the local policemen's pension and relief fund meets at least two (2) times annually;

The local firemen's relief and pension fund or the local policemen's pension and relief fund is actuarially sound as defined by the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board;

The rate of return earned by the local firemen's relief and pension fund or the local policemen's pension and relief fund over the most recent three-year period is at least equal to the rate of return for one-year United States Treasury notes over the most recent three-year period.

A higher standard for rate of return may be set by rule of the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board; and

The local firemen's relief and pension fund or the local policemen's pension and relief fund has been in compliance with this subchapter under § 24-11-202 in two (2) of the past three (3) years.

A local firemen's relief and pension fund or a local policemen's pension and relief fund shall meet the requirements of this section on or before December 31, 2008, and each year thereafter.

If the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board determines that a local firemen's relief and pension fund or a local policemen's pension and relief fund does not meet the minimum asset management standard under subsection (b) of this section, the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board shall:

Notify the local firemen's relief and pension fund or the local policemen's pension and relief fund and the sponsoring municipality of the local firemen's relief and pension fund or the local policemen's pension and relief fund of that fact and advise the local firemen's relief and pension fund or the local policemen's pension and relief fund of the steps necessary to comply with the standards; and

Require the local firemen's relief and pension fund or the local policemen's pension and relief fund to:

Establish a written investment policy that incorporates the rate of return established under subdivision (b)(1)(D) of this section and other requirements in accordance with rules promulgated by the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board; and

Obtain professional investment management in accordance with rules promulgated by the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board.

If the local firemen's relief and pension fund or the local policemen's pension and relief fund or its sponsoring municipality does not comply with subsection (c) of this section within six (6) months of the notification by the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board, then the local firemen's relief and pension fund or the local policemen's pension and relief fund shall develop a written plan of action in conjunction with the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board in accordance with rules promulgated by the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board.

The Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board shall promulgate rules necessary to implement the provisions of this section.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 851, § 1; 2009, No. 654, § 5.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment inserted “with this subchapter” in (b)(1)(E).

24-11-217. Additional allocation for certain underfunded plans.

An additional allocation for certain underfunded plans as described in this section is created.

The allocation shall be based on fifteen percent (15%) of the actuarial cost under § 24-11-214 and shall be available for certain policemen's pension and relief funds and firemen's relief and pension funds, including the portion of the actuarial cost for policemen's pension and relief funds and firemen's relief and pension funds that are administered by the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System.

The policemen's pension and relief funds and firemen's relief and pension funds shall qualify for the additional allocation after approval of the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board and after meeting the following criteria:

The policemen's pension and relief fund or the firemen's relief and pension fund is in compliance with all applicable laws and rules; and

The policemen's pension and relief fund or the firemen's relief and pension fund shall receive employer contributions other than premium tax allocations that are at least eighty percent (80%) of the actuarial cost under § 24-11-214 during the calendar year before an allocation.

An amount that is not distributed due to a policemen's pension and relief fund's or firemen's relief and pension fund's not meeting the requirements of subsection (c) of this section shall be retained and used to supplement the amounts needed for future years when the reductions under subsection (e) of this section apply.

The amounts provided under this allocation are subject to the limits under § 24-11-215.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 979, § 7; 2013, No. 500, § 1; 2019, No. 465, §§ 5, 6.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment rewrote (a)(2); and substituted “2012 through 2015” for “2012 — 2015” in (d).

The 2019 amendment redesignated (a)(1) as (a), and deleted “Beginning with the allocation in fiscal year 2012” from the beginning of present (a); deleted (a)(2); deleted “additional” preceding “allocation” in (b) and (e); substituted “fifteen percent (15%)” for “ten percent (10%)” in (b); and rewrote (d).

Subchapter 3
— Police Pension and Relief Funds Generally

Cross References.

Emergency duty, effect on retirement benefits, § 12-75-130.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1981, No. 270, § 6: Jan. 1, 1983.

Acts 1985, No. 304, § 3: Mar. 12, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that current law provides for distribution of insurance turnback for the support of individual police pension and relief funds, and for police officers covered under the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System, but that the certification process for the distribution of the tax is cumbersome and unclear, and that this Act is necessary to clarify the intent of existing law providing for the support of these retirement programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, No. 992, § 7: Jan. 1, 1986.

Acts 1995, No. 1266, § 7: Jan. 1, 1995.

Acts 1999, No. 1452, § 7: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that many of the retired police officers are not receiving adequate benefits, that often times, these officers have few financial resources outside of their pensions, that the policemen's pension and relief funds are often not able to pay full benefits to these officers because of their unfounded liabilities, and that a program which supplements the benefits of these retired officers which does not come from revenues of the pension funds themselves will benefit all citizens of the state and it is necessary to implement the changes in benefits at the beginning of the current fiscal year and therefore this act should have effect at that time. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 1570, § 10: Apr. 15, 1999. The emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly, that certain provisions of the law governing the Firemen's and Police Officers' Pension and Relief Fund need to be amended concerning the distribution and allocation of funds and that the effective administration of State government makes it necessary for these changes to begin immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 1540, § 5: Apr. 12, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that the provisions of this act must be implemented before the funds described herein are next disbursed in order to insure the fiscal well being of the beneficiaries of the Police and Fire Pension and Relief Funds. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 1701, § 10: April 2, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the provisions of this act must be implemented before the funds described herein are next disbursed in order to insure the fiscal well-being of the beneficiaries of the Police and Fire Pension and Relief Funds. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 1797, § 7: Apr. 23, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that premium tax distribution formula is directing state revenues to areas without the need for priority fire and police protection; that police and fire protection services are of extreme importance in the protection of property values and individual lives; that the distribution of premium tax revenues to the areas of the highest need is a top priority; that implementation of a revised distribution formula must be implemented before the normal time for the effectiveness of other laws; and that this act needs to be immediately effective to fulfill that priority. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 41, § 37: Feb. 6, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the local police and fire retirement systems provide economic security for eligible citizens of Arkansas; that the statutes need amending to update and clarify existing law; and that these changes need to be made immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

24-11-301. Appropriation of tax revenues from foreign insurers.

Sixty-six and two-thirds percent (662/3%) of the total tax revenues derived from premium taxes paid to the State of Arkansas by alien and foreign insurance companies upon premiums collected by the insurance companies upon insurance contracts written on motor vehicles, the licensed addresses of which are qualified cities or towns wherein the motor vehicles are insured against the perils of physical damage or the owner or operators of the motor vehicles are insured against legal liability arising out of the use, ownership, or operation of the motor vehicles, is appropriated and set aside for the:

Use and benefit of all duly qualified police officers' pension and relief funds;

Administrative and actuarial expenses of the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board; and

Arkansas Policemen's Pension Supplement Program.

The premium taxes collected in this subsection shall be placed in a fund combined with the premium taxes collected pursuant to § 24-11-809. The combined fund shall be entitled the “Firemen's and Police Officers' Pension and Relief Fund”.

The amount of the tax revenues attributable to the fire peril of physical damage insurance shall not be included.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 270, § 2; 1985, No. 992, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 66-2305; Acts 1995, No. 1266, § 4; 1999, No. 1394, § 1; 1999, No. 1452, § 1; 1999, No. 1570, § 1; 2001, No. 1540, § 3; 2003, No. 1797, § 2; 2013, No. 41, § 10.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1999, No. 1570, § 6 provided:

“The Department of Finance and Administration is authorized to promulgate such reasonable rules and regulations as are necessary to carry out the provisions of §§ 24-11-301, 24-11-302, 24-11-809, and 24-11-810.”

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1981, No. 270, § 1, provided: “The several cities that provide retirement and disability benefits to the members of their police departments and/or their survivors are now experiencing and will experience in the immediate future difficulty in discharging calls upon these funds for benefits. Additional funds must be made available to these funds and their beneficiaries.”

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment deleted former (a)(1)(C) and redesignated former (a)(1)(D) as present (a)(1)(C).

24-11-302. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning cities and towns qualified to participate and certain required reports, was repealed by Acts 2003, No. 1797, § 5. The section was derived from Acts 1981, No. 270, §§ 3, 4; 1983, No. 664, § 1; 1985, No. 304, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 66-2306, 66-2307; Acts 1995, No. 1266, § 5; 1997, No. 119, § 1; 1999, No. 1452, § 2; 1999, No. 1570, § 2; 2001, No. 1539, § 1; 2001, No. 1540, § 1; 2001, No. 1543, § 4; 2001, No. 1701, §§ 2-4.

24-11-303. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning payment, was repealed by Acts 2013, No. 41, § 11. The section was derived from Acts 1981, No. 270, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 66-2308.